Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6089.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature recognizes that equitable and accessible pathways across Washington's P20W system require greater alignment and coordination among state agencies, educational institutions, and workforce partners. The legislature further acknowledges the significant role that the philanthropic community can play in advancing efforts from early learning through K-12 education, postsecondary education, and into the workforce. At each transition point in the continuum, opportunities exist to strengthen internal coordination and build upon ongoing initiatives across the sectors. The legislature also recognizes that the absence of shared metrics to assess statewide progress and accountability toward common goals limits the P20W system's ability to achieve equitable outcomes for all Washingtonians and may make it difficult for the philanthropic community to understand where their efforts could make the most impact within the entirety of the system.(2) The legislature therefore intends to enhance Washington's education and workforce landscape by establishing a structured partnership between the state and the philanthropic community. This partnership is intended to identify, elevate, and support the work and visions already being pursued across the P20W continuum, and to create an official venue for aligning funding priorities, coordinating efforts, and fostering collaboration. Through this partnership, the state and the philanthropic community will work together with relevant stakeholders from the early learning, K-12 education, postsecondary education, and workforce communities, including labor, business, and community-based organizations, to strengthen existing initiatives and communicate shared priorities in a clear and coordinated manner to the broader public.(3) The legislature further intends to review and compile the ongoing and historical work of state agencies, councils, and advisory boards to identify current goals, strategies, and plans. Building upon this foundation, the state, in collaboration with the philanthropic community, will determine where targeted partnerships can advance, expand, or better support policies and programs that align with shared commitments of equity and student success. The legislature intends that this process will strengthen and update Washington's P20W system to address the state's evolving needs, support long-term implementation of these shared priorities, and increase transparency and public understanding of the system's direction.(4) The legislature finds that improved alignment, coordination, and transparent communication, supported through strong state-philanthropic partnerships, will enhance student preparation for an increasingly global economy and ensure Washington continues to lead in providing a robust, inclusive P20W system from early learning through K-12 education, postsecondary pathways, and the workforce.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:(1) For the purposes of this section and section 3 of this act, "P20W" means prekindergarten to grade 20 to workforce and encompasses the transitions from early learning to K-12 education to postsecondary education and career pathways to workforce. Career pathways include, but are not limited to, apprenticeships, certification, and licensure programs.(2)(a) The P20W public-private partnership account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources, federal funds, any appropriations made by the legislature, or other sources for the purposes specified in subsection (3) of this section and section 3 of this act must be deposited in the account.(b) Nothing in this section requires state funding be provided to the account created in this subsection.(3) Expenditures from the account may be used only for:(a)(i) The office of financial management to contract with a nonprofit organization with expertise in national and Washington state comparative education policy development to identify ongoing and historical work undertaken by state agencies, councils, advisory boards, and the philanthropic community related to the P20W system. The contracted nonprofit organization must facilitate increased coordination and alignment between the state and the philanthropic community in support of implementing the state's P20W vision.(ii) The contracted nonprofit organization may not have any rule-making or policy-making authority. All recommendations of the nonprofit organization must be submitted to the legislature according to the provisions in section 3 of this act and are subject to legislative action for implementation; and(b) The office of financial management, through the education data center established under RCW 43.41.400, to contract with a nonprofit organization with relevant expertise related to Washington data systems to provide assistance with creating a public-facing P20W formative performance and outcomes data dashboard.(4)(a) The activities described in this section must be conducted under a contract that is in accordance with section 3 of this act, and the office of financial management and any selected nonprofit organization must negotiate specific performance expectations.(b) The office of financial management may contract with the same nonprofit organization for both purposes described in subsection (3) of this section but is not required to do so.(5) Only the director of the office of financial management or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) A nonprofit organization receiving funding from the P20W public-private partnership account under section 2(3)(a) of this act must convene an advisory committee with stakeholders representing the P20W system. In developing its recommendations required in (b) of this subsection, the advisory committee must engage with representatives of tribes and subgroups representing the regional, racial, and cultural diversity of all children and families in Washington state, including those with specialized needs.(b) The advisory committee must develop recommendations related to the state's P20W education vision, including:(i) Developing a plan for coordinating and aligning new philanthropic contributions in a manner that best complements the state's ongoing investments across the P20W system, ensuring that such resources are used effectively to advance shared statewide goals;(ii) Aligning systems and existing efforts within each sector of the P20W system to improve academic achievement;(iii) Increasing postsecondary access and economic mobility opportunities;(iv) Improving the use of existing data and measurements, including reviewing the statewide indicators of educational system health established under RCW 28A.150.550 and other relevant performance indicators within each sector of the P20W system, and determining if these indicators could be updated and more connected with the P20W system;(v) Increasing public transparency and identifying ways to better communicate the state's P20W education vision to students, families, and the broader community;(vi) Fostering innovative approaches to education; and(vii) Easing the transition from early learning to K-12 education to postsecondary education and career pathways to workforce.(c) By July 1, 2027, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the contracted nonprofit organization under section 2(3)(a) of this act must submit a report to the relevant committees of the legislature and the philanthropic community with the advisory committee's recommendations under (b) of this subsection. The advisory committee, with support from the contracted nonprofit organization, must develop and approve the recommendations in the final report.(2)(a) By November 1, 2028, the education data center established under RCW 43.41.400, with the support of the contracted nonprofit organization under section 2(3)(b) of this act, must create a public-facing P20W formative performance and outcomes data dashboard that connects existing data systems and makes this data more accessible for the public to see how the state is making progress on its P20W education vision.(b) The data dashboard must, to the extent possible, incorporate or reference the relevant work already under way at state agencies and any existing state data or data dashboards available.(c) The data dashboard must include reporting on students' educational outcomes for diverse student populations, including students with disabilities, English learners, students of color, and students from low-income families. The data dashboard must include multiple measures of system inputs, milestones, student well-being, early learning, and student progress toward career and college readiness, to the extent data is available. The information provided in the data dashboard must be disaggregated as provided under RCW 28A.300.042(1), to the extent data is available.(d) The data dashboard must incorporate safeguards to protect confidential student information consistent with the requirements of the federal family educational rights and privacy act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g, as in effect on January 1, 2025, and applicable state laws.Sec. 4. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2025 c 399 s 13 and 2025 c 190 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury for cash management and cash balance purposes.(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general fund except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The 24/7 sobriety account, the Washington promise scholarship account, the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account, the Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship account, P20W public-private partnership account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the Washington college savings program account, the accessible communities account, the Washington achieving a better life experience program account, the Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program account, the community and technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the behavioral health loan repayment and scholarship program account, the Billy Frank Jr. national statuary hall collection fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the county 911 excise tax account, the county road administration board emergency loan account, the toll collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the energy facility site evaluation council account, the fair fund, the family and medical leave insurance account, the Fern Lodge maintenance account, the fish and wildlife federal lands revolving account, the natural resources federal lands revolving account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the forest health revolving account, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the educator conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the Washington history day account, the industrial insurance rainy day fund, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the low-income home rehabilitation account, the medication for people living with HIV rebate revenue account, the homeowner recovery account, the multiagency permitting team account, the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account, the pollution liability insurance program trust account, the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account, the regional transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the Washington sexual assault kit account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual development account program account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state library-archives building account, the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for deaf and hard of hearing youth account, the school for the blind account, the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, the school employees' benefits board insurance reserve fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance account, the school employees' insurance account, the long-term services and supports trust account, the radiation perpetual maintenance fund, the Indian health improvement reinvestment account, the department of licensing tuition recovery trust fund, the student achievement council tuition recovery trust fund, the tuition recovery trust fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the natural resources deposit fund, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the federal forest revolving account, the Washington saves administrative trust account, and the library operations account.(c) The following accounts and funds must receive 80 percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advance right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 5. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2025 c 399 s 14 and 2025 c 190 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury for cash management and cash balance purposes.(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general fund except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The 24/7 sobriety account, the Washington promise scholarship account, the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account, the Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship account, P20W public-private partnership account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the Washington college savings program account, the accessible communities account, the Washington achieving a better life experience program account, the Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program account, the community and technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the behavioral health loan repayment and scholarship program account, the Billy Frank Jr. national statuary hall collection fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the county 911 excise tax account, the county road administration board emergency loan account, the toll collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the energy facility site evaluation council account, the fair fund, the family and medical leave insurance account, the Fern Lodge maintenance account, the fish and wildlife federal lands revolving account, the natural resources federal lands revolving account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the forest health revolving account, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the educator conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the Washington history day account, the industrial insurance rainy day fund, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the low-income home rehabilitation account, the medication for people living with HIV rebate revenue account, the homeowner recovery account, the multiagency permitting team account, the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account, the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account, the regional transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the Washington sexual assault kit account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual development account program account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state library-archives building account, the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for deaf and hard of hearing youth account, the school for the blind account, the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, the school employees' benefits board insurance reserve fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance account, the school employees' insurance account, the long-term services and supports trust account, the radiation perpetual maintenance fund, the Indian health improvement reinvestment account, the department of licensing tuition recovery trust fund, the student achievement council tuition recovery trust fund, the tuition recovery trust fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the natural resources deposit fund, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the federal forest revolving account, the Washington saves administrative trust account, and the library operations account.(c) The following accounts and funds must receive 80 percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advance right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. Section 4 of this act expires July 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1, 2030.--- END ---